src/fst/morphology/orig/srcV2/esu.lexc.xfst
                     "@⁵+p|~v" -> "@⁵" "+" p                                        || [ t e ("°") | Con ] Sep* _   .o.
                     "@⁵+p|~v" -> "~" v                                                                             .o.
                     "+p|.v" -> "+" p e                                             || Con Sep* _ Sep* Con          .o.
                     "+p|.v" -> "+" p                                               || Con Sep* _                   .o.
                     "+p|.v" -> "." v                                                                               .o.
                     "+pegun|.vkun" -> "+" p e "&" g u n                            || Con Sep* _                   .o.
                     "+pegun|.vkun" -> "." v "&" k u n                                                              .o.
                     "+t|.s" -> "+" t                                               || Con Sep*  _                  .o.
                     "+t|.s" -> "." s                                                                               .o.
                     "+c|.s" -> "+" c                                               || Con Sep* _                   .o.
                     "+c|.s" -> "." s                                                                               .o.
                     "+c|.ss" -> "." ss                                             || Vow Sep* _                   .o.
                     "+c|.ss" -> "+" c                                                                              .o.          
                     "('a)" -> ' a                                                  || \.#. Con a Sep* _            .o.
                     "('a)" -> 0                                                                                     ;


define AutomaticDevoicing v -> vv,
                          l -> ll,
                          s -> ss,
                          g -> gg,
                          g̲ -> g̲g̲,
                          r -> rr,
                          r̲ -> r̲r̲,
                          u͡g -> u͡gg,
                          u͡r -> u͡rr         || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _      ,
                                               _ Sep* [ Stop ]                 .o.
                          m -> m̄,
                          n -> n̄,
                          ng -> n͞g          || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _        ;

! Unnecessary devoicing                           
!                          r -> rr          || _ Sep* .#.                            .o.
!                          s -> ss          || .#. Sep* _                             ;

regex 
      Lowercase          .o. ! comment out to pass through for [NonYupik]
      arExpansion        .o.
      MultipleForms      .o.  
      AutomaticDevoicing  ;
